Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-52] Compulsory self-incrimination
prohibited. (a) No person subject to this chapter may compel any person
to incriminate the person's self or to answer any question the answer to which
may tend to incriminate the person.

(b) No person subject to this chapter may
interrogate, or request any statement from, an accused or a person suspected of
an offense without first informing the person of the nature of the accusation
and advising the person that the person does not have to make any statement regarding
the offense of which the person is accused or suspected and that any statement
made by the person may be used as evidence against the person in a trial by
court-martial.

(c) No person subject to this chapter may
compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any military
tribunal if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue and may tend
to degrade the person.

(d) No statement obtained from any person in
violation of this section, or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence,
or unlawful inducement may be received in evidence against the person in a
trial by court-martial. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next